New York, session 2025-2026, A8893.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new article 2 45-A to read as follows: 3 ARTICLE 45-A 4 DEVICE-LEVEL AGE ASSURANCE 5 Section 1509. Definitions. 6 1510. Age assurance required. 7 1511. Nondiscrimination. 8 1512. Rulemaking authority. 9 1513. Scope. 10 1514. Enforcement. 11 § 1509. Definitions. For the purposes of this article, the following 12 terms shall have the following meanings: 13 1. "Application programming interface" or "API" shall mean a system 14 that allows two or more software systems to communicate and exchange 15 information, features, and functionality. 16 2. "Application store" shall mean a publicly available website, soft- 17 ware application, or online service that distributes third party plat- 18 forms' software applications to an internet-enabled device. 19 3. "Covered manufacturer" shall mean a manufacturer of an internet-en- 20 abled device, an operating system provider, or an application store. 21 4. "Covered minor" shall mean a user of an internet-enabled device who 22 a covered manufacturer has determined via one or more commercially 23 reasonable age assurance methods to be under the age of eighteen. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13065-02-5 A. 8893 2 1 5. "Internet-enabled device" shall mean and include any desktop, 2 laptop, smartphone, tablet, or other device capable of connecting to the 3 internet and enabling the user to access content on the internet, 4 including a social media platform. 5 6. "Operating system" shall mean the system software that manages the 6 hardware of an internet-enabled device and allows programs and applica- 7 tions to run on such device. 8 7. "Operating system provider" shall mean any person, partnership, 9 association, firm, business, or other legal entity, or any member there- 10 of, who develops, distributes, and/or maintains an internet-enabled 11 device's operating system, including but not limited to the design, 12 programming, or supply of operating systems for internet-enabled 13 devices. 14 8. "Social media platform" shall have the same meaning as in subdivi- 15 sion five of section eleven hundred of this chapter. 16 § 1510. Age assurance required. 1. Upon activation of an internet-ena- 17 bled device, a covered manufacturer shall conduct commercially reason- 18 able age assurance to determine whether a user is a covered minor. The 19 attorney general shall promulgate regulations identifying methods for 20 commercially reasonable and technically feasible age assurance, which 21 shall consider the size, financial resources, and technical capabilities 22 of covered manufacturers, the costs and effectiveness of available age 23 assurance techniques for users of internet-enabled devices, and preva- 24 lent practices of the industry of covered manufacturers. Such regu- 25 lations shall also identify the appropriate levels of accuracy that 26 would be considered commercially reasonable and technically feasible for 27 operators to achieve in determining whether a user is a covered minor, 28 provided, however, that user self-reporting of age to a covered manufac- 29 turer with no other supporting evidence shall not be an acceptable meth- 30 od of age assurance under this section. Any information collected for 31 the purpose of the age assurance requirement under this subparagraph 32 shall be deleted immediately after an attempt to determine a person's 33 age, except where necessary for applicable provisions of state or feder- 34 al law or regulation. 35 2. After determining that a user is a covered minor under subdivision 36 one of this section, a covered manufacturer shall provide all websites, 37 online services, online applications, mobile applications, or portions 38 thereof on such user's internet-enabled device and/or application store 39 manufactured by the covered manufacturer with a digital signal that such 40 user is a covered minor via a real-time application programming inter- 41 face (API). 42 3. A covered manufacturer shall ensure that, for any internet-enabled 43 devices sold after the effective date of this article, the requirements 44 of this section are included in any operating system and application 45 store updates by default after such effective date. 46 § 1511. Nondiscrimination. 1. A covered manufacturer shall impose at 47 least the same restrictions and obligations on its own websites, appli- 48 cations, and online services as it imposes on the websites, applica- 49 tions, and online services of third parties. 50 2. A covered manufacturer shall not withhold, degrade, lower the qual- 51 ity, or increase the price of any product, service, or feature to a user 52 due to the provisions of this article, other than as necessary for 53 compliance with the provisions of this article. 54 3. A covered manufacturer shall delete all information collected for 55 the purposes of section fifteen hundred ten of this article after such 56 purpose has been achieved. A. 8893 3 1 § 1512. Rulemaking authority. The attorney general shall promulgate 2 such rules and regulations as are necessary to effectuate and enforce 3 the provisions of this article. 4 § 1513. Scope. This article shall apply to conduct that occurs in 5 whole or in part in New York. For purposes of this article, conduct 6 takes place wholly outside of New York when an internet-enabled device, 7 an operating system provider, or an application store is accessed by a 8 user who is physically located outside of New York. 9 § 1514. Enforcement. 1. Whenever it appears to the attorney general, 10 either upon complaint or otherwise, that any person, within or outside 11 the state, has engaged in or is about to engage in any of the acts or 12 practices stated to be unlawful in this article, the attorney general 13 may bring an action or special proceeding in the name and on behalf of 14 the people of the state of New York to enjoin any violation of this 15 article, to obtain restitution of any moneys or property obtained 16 directly or indirectly by any such violation, to obtain disgorgement of 17 any profits or gains obtained directly or indirectly by any such 18 violation, including but not limited to the destruction of unlawfully 19 obtained data, to obtain damages caused directly or indirectly by any 20 such violation, to obtain civil penalties of up to ten thousand dollars 21 per violation, and to obtain any such other and further relief as the 22 court may deem proper, including preliminary relief. 23 2. Nothing in this article shall be construed as providing the basis 24 for, or be subject to, a private right of action to violations of this 25 article or under any other law. 26 3. A covered manufacturer shall not be subject to the liability under 27 this article if such manufacturer has taken commercially reasonable 28 steps to estimate the age of its users as provided in section fifteen 29 hundred ten of this article. 30 4. The attorney general shall maintain a website to receive 31 complaints, information, or referrals from members of the public 32 concerning a covered manufacturer's alleged compliance or noncompliance 33 with the provisions of this article. 34 § 2. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section or part 35 of this act shall be adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to 36 be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the 37 remainder thereof, but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, 38 sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section or part thereof directly 39 involved in the controversy in which such judgment shall have been 40 rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of the legislature that 41 this act would have been enacted even if such invalid provisions had not 42 been included herein. 43 § 3. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 44 law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any 45 rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on its 46 effective date are authorized to be made and completed on or before such 47 effective date.